Mississippi statutes. Title 95. Torts
Chapter 15. Liability Exemption for Report of Suspicious Activity or Behavior

§ 95-15-1.
Limitation of liability for report of suspicious activity or behavior.

The School Safety Center within the State Department of Education shall develop and implement a statewide media campaign to prioritize and raise awareness for the “See Something, Say Something Act” established under this section, as well as the national campaign established by the United States Department of Homeland Security, as a measure to encourage good faith reporting of suspicious activity to law enforcement agencies. The media campaign shall inform the public of the protections provided by the law in addition to useful tools, resources, appropriate local law enforcement agencies and emergency services contact information, and partnering entities, including, the Mississippi Office of Homeland Security, the Mississippi Department of Public Safety and the Mississippi Department of Mental Health. In addition to the media campaign, the School Safety Center shall also make this information available on the Internet website of the State Department of Education.

A person who in good faith makes a report of suspicious activity or behavior shall be immune from civil and criminal liability for the making of the report if the report is based on objectively reasonable suspicion.

For purposes of this section, “report of suspicious activity or behavior” means any communication to a law enforcement officer or agency or other appropriate authority of the behavior or activity of another person if the report is made with the reasonable belief that the behavior or activity constitutes or is in furtherance of an act of terrorism.

This section does not apply to the intentional making of a report known to be false, including a violation of Section 97-35-47, or to a report made with reckless disregard for the truth of the report.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2016, ch. 427, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2016); Laws, 2019, ch. 427, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 2019.